Idaho, session 2025, H0214.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 54-1010, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-1010. INSTALLATIONS BY ELECTRICAL CONTRACTOR PERFORMED BY LI-
CENSED RESIDENTIAL OR JOURNEYMAN ELECTRICIAN -- PRIOR CERTIFICATE HOLDERS
ENTITLED TO LICENSE -- LIST OF ELECTRICIANS IN CONTRACTOR'S EMPLOY. (1) Any
electrical contractor who works as a residential or journeyman electrician,
as herein defined, shall be required to have a residential electrician's
license or journeyman electrician's license or master electrician's license
issued under the provisions of this act. All installations of electrical
wiring, equipment or apparatus made by an electrical contractor shall be
done by or under the direct supervision of a licensed residential electri-
cian, licensed journeyman electrician, or licensed master electrician. For
the purposes of this section, "supervision" means that the licensed resi-
dential electrician, licensed journeyman electrician, or licensed master
electrician shall be available during working hours to provide supervision
as needed and shall be responsible for the supervision of electrical instal-
lations made by a contractor under his supervision.
(2) The individual owner of an electrical contracting business shall
employ a full-time journeyman electrician with over two thousand (2,000)
hours of documented experience as a licensed journeyman electrician or a
master electrician; however, an individual owner of an electrical contract-
ing business may act as his own journeyman electrician or master electrician
provided that he has complied with the provisions of this section and section
54-1002, Idaho Code, pertaining to journeyman electricians. Each electri-
cal contractor in this state shall, upon request of the administrator or his
authorized agent, furnish a list of journeyman electricians in said electri-
cal contractor's employ.
(3) Any individual working as an apprentice electrician, as defined
in this act, must be registered with the division of occupational and pro-
fessional licenses as an apprentice electrician, as provided in section
54-1007, Idaho Code, and it shall be unlawful for an individual to work as an
apprentice electrician without possessing a current apprentice registra-
tion certificate. The supervision ratio in a residential setting shall be
one (1) residential electrician, journeyman electrician, or master elec-
trician to no more than six (6) apprentice electricians. The supervision
ratio in any setting other than a residential setting shall be one (1) jour-


neyman electrician or master electrician to no more than two (2) apprentice
electricians. No supervision ratio applies to an apprentice electrician
who has completed six thousand (6,000) or more hours of work experience as
an Idaho-registered apprentice or in accordance with the requirements of
the jurisdiction where the applicant obtained such experience and who is
currently enrolled in or has completed a board-approved career technical
education program.
(4) Any individual working as a limited electrical installer trainee,
as defined in this chapter, must be registered with the division of occupa-
tional and professional licenses as a limited electrical installer trainee.
It shall be unlawful for an individual to work as a limited electrical in-
staller trainee without possessing a current registration certificate. No
supervision ratio applies to limited electrical installer trainees.
(5) The provisions of this section preempt, eliminate, and prohibit any
cities, counties, incorporated or unincorporated areas, special use dis-
tricts, or any other local governmental entities of any kind from adopting
requirements through any code, ordinance, process, policy, or guidance that
differ from or are more extensive than the requirements of this section. The
preemption provided for in this subsection shall apply to any local code, or-
dinance, process, policy, or guidance in effect prior to, on, or after July
1, 2023.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.